Hawaii statutes.
§188-36 Hawaii marine laboratory refuge.
It is unlawful for any person within the Hawaii marine laboratory refuge to
take any aquatic life. Nothing in this section shall apply to any officer,
faculty member, employee, or student of the University of Hawaii or licensee of
the board of regents of the University of Hawaii, while employed in catching or
taking aquatic life for scientific purposes.

The Hawaii marine laboratory refuge consists of
the reefs and bay waters surrounding the island of Moku-o-loe located in
Kaneohe Bay, island of Oahu, from the high water mark on the island extending
outward to "twenty-five feet beyond the outer edges of the reefs".

All laws enacted for the protection of aquatic
life or wildlife shall likewise apply to the Hawaii marine laboratory refuge,
except that no person or persons, other than those designated by this section,
shall be authorized to catch or take aquatic life in the refuge.

The Hawaii marine laboratory refuge shall
continue only as long as the regents of the University of Hawaii maintain the
Hawaii marine laboratory on the island of Moku-o-loe, island of Oahu. [L 1953,
c 85, §§1, 2; RL 1955, §21-69; HRS §188-36; am L 1981, c 85, §45]

Law Journals and Reviews

Protecting Hawai‘i's
Fisheries: Creating an Effective Regulatory Scheme to Sustain Hawai‘i's Fish
Stocks. 29 UH L. Rev. 243.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next